Missouri, session 2026, HB3284.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
D
Section A. Chapter 9, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 9.512, to read as follows:
9.512. August twenty-seventh each year is hereby designated as "Crystal Lynn
H
2 Foundation Day" in Missouri. The citizens of this state are encouraged to participate in
3 appropriate events and activities for education about and service to individuals
4 impacted by gTun violence.
✔
I
W
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.